Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
CHAPTER 6 Livestock Dealers and Auctions

Cross references.

Criminal penalty for livestock theft, §

16-8-20

.

Sale or disposition of livestock or swine belonging to state, §

50-16-80

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Livestock auctions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-13-4.